Oklahoma, session 2026, SB1194.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:


SECTION 1. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified


in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 14-137 of Title 70, unless there


is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:


A. The State Board of Career and Technology Education, in


conjunction with the State Board of Education, shall establish and

Req. No. 2174 Page 1


maintain a pilot program to provide grants to public school


districts to offer career and technology programs to students in


grades nine through twelve.


B. A public school district may be eligible to receive a grant


pursuant to this section if:


1. The public school district can demonstrate that the career


and technology program to be offered is not currently available at a


technology center school within fifty (50) miles of the school


district;


2. The public school district can demonstrate with data and


research that the career and technology program will meet a


workforce need;


3. The public school district can demonstrate public support


for the career and technology program including student interest in


enrolling in the program; and


4. The public school district meets any other requirements


established by the State Board of Career and Technology Education


and the State Board of Education.


C. 1. A public school district seeking to participate in the


pilot program shall apply to the State Board of Career and


Technology Education for a grant in the manner and on a form


prescribed by the Board. Grant applications shall be reviewed and


approved or disapproved by the State Board of Career and Technology


Education and the State Board of Education.

Req. No. 2174 Page 2


2. The State Board of Career and Technology Education and the


State Board of Education shall ensure that pilot program grants are


given to a representative sample of Oklahoma school districts, which


shall include:


a. a school district with an average daily membership


(ADM) of more than two thousand five hundred (2,500)


students but fewer than ten thousand (10,000)


students,


b. a school district with an ADM of two thousand five


hundred (2,500) students or fewer, and


c. a school district with an ADM of one thousand (1,000)


students or fewer.


D. Subject to the availability of funds, Ten Million Dollars


($10,000,000.00) shall be allocated by the State Board of Career and


Technology Education to fund pilot program grants. Grant amounts


shall be determined based on the number of approved applicants and


the cost of the proposed career and technology program.


E. One year after implementation of the pilot program, school


districts that receive pilot program grants pursuant to this section


shall provide a report to the State Board of Education and the State


Board of Career and Technology Education that includes an itemized


expenditure list, data on student participation, and


recommendations, if any, for future program operations.



Req. No. 2174 Page 3


F. The State Board of Education shall review career and


technology programs established pursuant to this section to


determine if they are eligible for academic credit toward meeting


the graduation requirements set forth in Section 11-103.6 of Title


of the Oklahoma Statutes.


G. The State Board of Career and Technology Education and the


State Board of Education shall promulgate rules necessary to


implement the provisions of this section.


SECTION 2. This act shall become effective July 1, 2026.


SECTION 3. It being immediately necessary for the preservation


of the public peace, health, or safety, an emergency is hereby


declared to exist, by reason whereof this act shall take effect and


be in full force from and after its passage and approval.




60-2-2174 EB 11/13/2025 11:42:01 AM



















Req. No. 2174 Page 4